Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB103.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 6102. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Noncustodial parent." The biological parent of a minor child with whom the child does not reside or with whom there is a court-ordered shared custody of the minor child.* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 2. Sections 6105(e)(1)(i), 6107(a), 6108(a)(4) introductory paragraph and (iii) and (g), 6108.7(b), 6109(a), 6113(f) and 6114(c) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 6105. Responsibilities of law enforcement agencies.* * *(e) Statewide registry.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish a Statewide registry of protection orders and shall maintain a complete and systematic record and index of all valid temporary and final court orders of protection, court-approved consent agreements and a foreign protection order filed pursuant to section 6104(d) (relating to full faith and credit and foreign protection orders). The Statewide registry shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:(i) The names of the plaintiff and any protected parties or noncustodial parent.* * *§ 6107. Hearings.(a) General rule.--Within ten business days of the filing of a petition under this chapter, a hearing shall be held before the court, at which the plaintiff must prove the allegation of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence. The court shall, at the time the defendant is given notice of the hearing, advise the defendant of the right to be represented by counsel, of the right to present evidence, of the right to compel attendance of witnesses, of the method by which witnesses may be compelled, of the possibility that any firearm, other weapon or ammunition owned and any firearm license possessed may be ordered temporarily relinquished, of the options for relinquishment of a firearm pursuant to this chapter, of the possibility that 20250SB0103PN0056 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal or State law may prohibit the possession of firearms, including an explanation of 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(8) (relating to unlawful acts) and 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms), and that any protection order granted by a court may be considered in any subsequent proceedings under this title. This notice shall be printed and delivered in a manner which easily attracts attention to its content and shall specify that child custody is one of the proceedings where prior protection orders may be considered. If applicable, a noncustodial parent shall be given notice of the hearing.* * *§ 6108. Relief.(a) General rule.--Subject to subsection (a.1), the court may grant any protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the plaintiff or minor children. The order or agreement may include:* * *(4) Awarding temporary custody of or establishing temporary visitation rights with regard to minor children. In determining whether to award temporary custody or establish temporary visitation rights pursuant to this paragraph, the court shall consider any risk posed by the defendant to the children as well as risk to the plaintiff. If appropriate, the court shall consult with a noncustodial parent. The following shall apply:* * *(iii) Where the court finds after a hearing under this chapter that the defendant has inflicted serious abuse upon the plaintiff or a child or poses a risk of 20250SB0103PN0056 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 abuse toward the plaintiff or a child, the court may:(A) award supervised visitation in a secure visitation facility; [or](B) deny the defendant custodial access to a child[.]; or(C) award custody to a noncustodial parent.* * *(g) Notice.--Notice shall be given to the defendant and noncustodial parent, in orders issued under this section, stating that violations of an order will subject the defendant to arrest under section 6113 (relating to arrest for violation of order) or contempt of court under section 6114 (relating to contempt for violation of order or agreement). Resumption of coresidency on the part of the plaintiff and defendant shall not nullify the provisions of the court order.* * *§ 6108.7. Order to seal record from public view.* * *(b) Notice to district attorney [and], plaintiff and noncustodial parent.--(1) The petitioner shall serve a copy of the petition under subsection (a) to the district attorney [and to], the plaintiff and a noncustodial parent within ten days of the filing of the petition.(2) The district attorney [and], the plaintiff and the noncustodial parent shall have an opportunity to be heard at the hearing.(3) Within 30 days of receipt of notice, the district attorney [or], plaintiff or noncustodial parent may file objections to the petition.20250SB0103PN0056 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) If no objection under paragraph (3) is timely filed, the court may grant the petition without further hearing if the requirements of this section have been met.(5) As used in this subsection, the term "plaintiff" means the person who entered into the consent agreement with the defendant.* * *§ 6109. Service of orders.(a) Issuance.--A copy of an order under this chapter shall be issued to the plaintiff, the defendant [and], the police department with appropriate jurisdiction to enforce the order or agreement and a noncustodial parent in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or as ordered by the court or hearing officer.* * *§ 6113. Arrest for violation of order.* * *(f) Hearing.--A hearing shall be scheduled within ten days of the filing of the charge or complaint of indirect criminal contempt. The hearing and any adjudication shall not preclude a hearing on other criminal charges underlying the contempt, nor shall a hearing or adjudication on other criminal charges preclude a hearing on a charge of indirect criminal contempt. A noncustodial parent may participate in the hearing on behalf of the minor child.§ 6114. Contempt for violation of order or agreement.* * *(c) Notification upon release.--The appropriate releasing authority or other official as designated by local rule shall use all reasonable means to notify the victim and a noncustodial 20250SB0103PN0056 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parent sufficiently in advance of the release of the offender from any incarceration imposed under subsection (b). Notification shall be required for work release, furlough, medical leave, community service, discharge, escape and recapture. Notification shall include the terms and conditions imposed on any temporary release from custody. The plaintiff and the noncustodial parent must keep the appropriate releasing authority or other official as designated by local rule advised of contact information; failure to do so will constitute waiver of any right to notification under this section.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0103PN0056 - 6 - 123456789101112